Louisiana, session 2026, SB439.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2581.4 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2581.4. Cancer screenings; certain firefighters and fire service employees
A. A classified firefighter employed as a full-time paid employee of a
municipal or parish fire department or fire protection district and fire service
employees employed by a nonprofit corporation under contract with a fire protection
district shall be provided a cancer screening examination and precancer screening
conducted by a physician or a qualified healthcare provider. The initial cancer
screening examination shall be conducted not less than three years after the start of
employment, and subsequent examinations shall be conducted during the course of
employment in accordance with the following schedule:
(1) Every five years for firefighters and fire service employees who are not
less than twenty years of age and not more than thirty-nine years of age.
(2) Every four years for firefighters and fire service employees who are not
less than forty years of age and not more than forty-nine years of age.
(3) Every three years for firefighters and fire service employees who are fifty
years of age or older.
(4) Every ten years for every firefighter and fire service employee
beginning with the first ten years of employment and in ten-year intervals
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 439 ENROLLED
thereafter for precancer screening or testing.
B. The examination shall include but not be limited to screening for the
following cancers:
(1) Colon.
(2) Lung.
(3) Bladder.
(4) Oral.
(5) Thyroid.
(6) Skin.
(7) Blood.
(8) Breast.
(9) Cervical.
(10) Testicular.
(11) Prostate.
C. Effective January 1, 2027, precancer screenings for esophageal cancer
shall be made available to every firefighter and fire service employee in
accordance with the schedule provided in Subsection A of this Section, but
terminable in all cases at the age of sixty.
D. Any firefighter or fire service employee who retires from active service,
including a firefighter or fire service employee who retires due to a disability, shall
be provided cancer and precancer screening examinations by his former employer
pursuant to the schedule provided in Subsection A of this Section.
D.E. All costs associated with cancer screening and precancer screening
examinations provided for in this Section shall be paid by the firefighter's or fire
service employee's employer or former employer. No copayment, deductible,
coinsurance, or any out-of-pocket expense shall be required for such examinations.
E.F. No firefighter or fire service employee shall be required to participate
in cancer or precancer screening examinations.
F.G. The provisions of the Section shall not be applicable to any firefighter
or fire service employee who resigned or was terminated by his employer.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 439 ENROLLED
G.H. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require a personal health
insurance company to pay for cancer and precancer screening examinations for
firefighters or fire service employees that are conducted more frequently than such
examinations are recommended in the most recently published recommendations
established by the American Cancer Society or the National Comprehensive Cancer
Network.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.